Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1068
License; display.

Every person holding a license issued by the department under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act shall display it in a conspicuous place in his or her principal place of employment, and every cosmetology establishment and body art facility shall so display the then current licenses of all practitioners there employed.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 57;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 29;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 20;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-396;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 330.